District of Columbia statutes.
2-310.01e

Repealed

Notice and affidavit requirements.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1005a
as added May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-116, § 2, 33 DCR 2432
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-127, § 6(e), 39 DCR 3828
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 6(b), 41 DCR 2597
1981 Ed., § 1-1192.5.